Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.44.190

Disposition of unclaimed personal property.

Whenever any bank shall be liquidated, voluntarily or involuntarily, and shall retain in its possession at the conclusion of the liquidation, uncalled for and unclaimed personal property left with it for safekeeping, such property shall, in the presence of at least one witness, be inventoried by the liquidating agent and sealed in separate packages, each package plainly marked with the name and last known address of the person in whose name the property stands on the books of the bank. If the property is in safe deposit boxes, such boxes shall be opened by the liquidating agent in the presence of at least one witness, and the property inventoried, sealed in packages and marked as above required. All the packages shall be transmitted to the director, together with certificates signed by the liquidating agent and witness or witnesses, listing separately the property standing in the name of any one person on the books of the bank, together with the date of inventory, and name and last known address of the person in whose name the property stands.

[ 2014 c 37 s 235; 1994 c 92 s 123; 1955 c 33 s 30.44.190. Prior: 1947 c 148 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 3281-2. Formerly RCW 30.44.190.]